Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB514.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(c) of the act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 5. Rules for licensing and operation.* * *(c) Operation.--Each licensed association shall comply with the following restrictions and rules governing the operation of bingo:* * *(14) A licensed association may sell tickets to its bingo event online.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819